Kansas, session 2025-2026, HB2301.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
Section 1. K.S.A. 75-3718b is hereby amended to read as follows: 75-
3718b. (a) On or before January 14, 2019, the secretary of administration,
in consultation with the division of the budget, the office of revisor of
statutes and the Kansas legislative research department, shall implement a
budget process that accomplishes the following objectives:
(1) A program service inventory, to be complete on or before January
9, 2017. Such inventory shall include, but not be limited to, the following:
(A) Identification of agency programs and subprograms by objective,
function and purpose;
(B) the state or federal statutory citation authorizing those programs,
if any;
(C) identification of programs that are mandatory versus
discretionary;
(D) a history of the programs, including interaction with other agency
programs and objectives;
(E) state matching or other federal financial requirements;
(F) prioritization of the level of all programs and subprograms; and
(G) the consequence of not funding the program or subprogram.
(2) An integrated budget fiscal process, to be complete on or before
January 6, 2018. Such process shall institute common accounting
procedures consistent with budget development, budget approval, budget
submission, through actual expenditures by fund.
(3) A performance based budgeting system, to be completed on or
before January 14, 2019. Such budgeting system shall include, but not be
limited to, the following:
(A) Incorporation of various outcome based performance measures,
for state programs; and
(B) enhancement of the capability to compare program effectiveness
across multiple state and political boundaries.
(b) The provisions of this section shall not apply to postsecondary

HB 2301 2
educational institutions that have implemented the performance agreement
pursuant to K.S.A. 74-3202d, and amendments thereto.
Sec. 2. K.S.A. 75-3718b is hereby repealed.
Sec. 3. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the statute book.